Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2911
Dangerous disease, defined.

Dangerous disease means an infectious, contagious, or otherwise transmissible disease, infestation, or exposure which has the potential for rapid spread, serious economic impact, or serious threat to livestock health, and is of major importance in the trade of livestock and livestock products.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 11.
November 14, 2020